Washington statutes.
RCW 21.30.160

Unlawful use or disclosure of information.

Neither the director nor any employee of the director shall use any information which is filed with or obtained by the department which is not public information for personal gain or benefit, nor shall the director nor any employee of the director conduct any securities or commodity dealings whatsoever based upon any such information, even though public, if there has not been a sufficient period of time for the securities or commodity markets to assimilate the information.

[ 1986 c 14 s 17.]